Utah statutes.
19-6-503.   Powers and duties of public entities.
(1)  Subject to the powers and rules of the department and except as provided
by Section 19-6-507, a governing body of a public entity may:
(a)  supervise and regulate the collection, transportation, and disposition of
solid waste generated within its jurisdiction;
(b)  provide a solid waste management facility to adequately handle solid
waste generated or existing within or without its jurisdiction;
(c)  assume, by agreement, responsibility for the collection and disposition
of solid waste whether generated within or without its jurisdiction;
(d)  enter into a short or long-term interlocal agreement to provide for or
operate a solid waste management facility with:
(i)  another public entity;
(ii)  a public agency, as defined in Section 11-13-103;
(iii)  a private person; or
(iv)  a combination of persons listed in Subsections (1)(d)(i) through (iii);
(e)  levy and collect a tax, fee, or charge or require a license as may be
appropriate to discharge its responsibility for the acquisition, construction,
operation, maintenance, and improvement of a solid waste management facility,
including licensing a private collector operating within its jurisdiction;
(f)  require that solid waste generated within its jurisdiction be delivered
to a solid waste management facility;
(g)  control the right to collect, transport, and dispose of solid waste
generated within its jurisdiction;
(h)  agree that, according to Section 19-6-505, the exclusive right to
collect, transport, and dispose of solid waste within its jurisdiction may be
assumed by:
(i)  another public entity;
(ii)  a private person; or
(iii)  a combination of persons listed in Subsections (1)(h)(i) through (ii);
(i)  accept and disburse funds derived from a federal or state grant, a
private source, or money that may be appropriated by the Legislature for the
acquisition, construction, ownership, operation, maintenance, and improvement
of a solid waste management facility;
(j)  contract for the lease or purchase of land, a facility, or a vehicle for
the operation of a solid waste management facility;
(k)  establish one or more policies for the operation of a solid waste
management facility, including:
(i)  hours of operation;
(ii)  character and kind of wastes accepted at a disposal site; and
(iii)  another policy necessary for the safety of the operating personnel;
(l)  sell or contract for the sale, according to a short or long-term
agreement, of usable material, energy, fuel, or heat separated, extracted,
recycled, or recovered from solid waste in a solid waste management facility,
on terms in its best interest;
(m)  pledge, assign, or otherwise convey as security for the payment of bonds,
revenues and receipts derived from the sale or contract or from the operation
and ownership of a solid waste management facility or an interest in it;
(n)  issue a bond according to Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding
Act;
(o)  issue industrial development revenue bonds according to Title 11, Chapter
17, Utah Industrial Facilities and Development Act, to pay the costs of
financing a project consisting of a solid waste management facility on behalf
of an entity that constitutes the users of a solid waste management facility
project within the meaning of Section 11-17-2;
(p)  agree to construct and operate or to provide for the construction and
operation of a solid waste management facility project, which project manages
the solid waste of a public entity or private person, according to one or more
contracts and other arrangements provided for in a proceeding according to
which a bond is issued; and
(q)  issue a bond to pay the cost of establishing reserves to pay principal
and interest on the bonds as provided for in the proceedings according to
which the bonds are issued.
(2)  The power to issue a bond under this section is in addition to the power
to issue a bond under Title 11, Chapter 17, Utah Industrial Facilities and
Development Act.
